apertium-fin-eng.eng.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>   ! Имя существительное · Noun
%<vblex%> ! lexical verb
%<vaux%> ! lexical verb
%<adj%> ! adjective
%<num%> ! numeral
%<adv%> ! adverb
%<prn%> ! pronoun 
%<pr%> ! adposition
%<ij%> ! Interjection
%<cnjcoo%> ! Co-ordinating conjunction
%<cnjsub%> ! Sub-ordinating conjunction 
%<ind%> ! Indefinite
%<def%> ! Definite

%<sg%> ! Singular       
%<pl%> ! Plural

%<sint%>  ! Synthetic
%<actv%>%<ger%>  ! Gerund
%<subst%>  ! Substantive

%<nom%>  !Nominative    
%<acc%>  !Accusative    

%<actv%> ! Active voice 
%<pasv%> ! Passive voice
%<pres%> !Present       
%<past%> !Past  
%<inf%> !Infinitive     

%<p1%> ! First person   
%<p2%> ! Second person  
%<p3%> ! Third person   

%<pst%> ! Positive      
%<comp%> ! Comparative  wikipedia
%<sup%> ! Sup

%<itg%> ! interrog
%<ant%> ! interrog
%<m%> ! interrog
%<f%> ! interrog
%<np%> ! interrog
%<pers%> ! interrog
%<gen%> ! interrog
%<det%> ! interrog
%<pos%> ! interrog
%<sp%> ! interrog
%<mf%> ! interrog
%<mg%> ! interrog
%<nt%> ! interrog
%<dem%> ! interrog
%<ind%> ! interrog

! Punctuation
%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side)
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side)
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)

%.
%,
%  

%+

LEXICON Root

0 Nouns ; 
0 Verbs ; 
0 Adjectives ; 
0 Adverbs ; 
0 Prepositions ; 
0 Conjunctions ; 
0 Propers ; 
0 Pronouns ; 
0 Determiners ; 
0 Numerals ;
0 Punctuation ;
0 Interjections ;

LEXICON N

%<sg%>%<nom%>:0 # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:'s # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:s # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:s' # ;

LEXICON N_TOOTH

tooth%<sg%>%<nom%>:tooth # ;
tooth%<sg%>%<gen%>:tooth's # ;
tooth%<pl%>%<nom%>:teeth # ;
tooth%<pl%>%<gen%>:teeth's # ;

LEXICON N_PHENOMENON

%<sg%>%<nom%>:on # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:on's # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:a # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:a's # ;

LEXICON N_INDEX

%<sg%>%<nom%>:ex # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:ex's # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:ices # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:ices' # ;

LEXICON N_DATUM

%<sg%>%<nom%>:um # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:um's # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:a # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:a's # ;

LEXICON N_STAFF

%<sg%>%<nom%>:ff # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:ff's # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:ves # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:ves' # ;

LEXICON N_HALF

%<sg%>%<nom%>:f # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:f's # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:ves # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:ves' # ;

LEXICON N_CHILDREN

%<sg%>%<nom%>:0 # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:'s # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:ren # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:ren's # ;

LEXICON N_DICTIONARY

%<sg%>%<nom%>:y # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:y's # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:ies # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:ies' # ;

LEXICON N_FLUSH

%<sg%>%<nom%>:0 # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:'s # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:es # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:es' # ;

LEXICON N_ILLNESS

%<sg%>%<nom%>:0 # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:' # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:es # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:es' # ;

LEXICON N_LIFE

%<sg%>%<nom%>:fe # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:fe's # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:ves # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:ves' # ;

LEXICON N_WOMAN

%<sg%>%<nom%>:an # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:an's # ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:en # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:en's # ;

LEXICON V

%<inf%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:s # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ed # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ing # ;
%<subst%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ing # ;

LEXICON V_BE

%<inf%>:be # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:am # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:are # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:is # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:are # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:are # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:are # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:was # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:was # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:were # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:were # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:were # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:were # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:being # ;

LEXICON V_HAVE

%<inf%>:have # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:have # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:has # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:had # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:having # ;

LEXICON V_MAKE

%<inf%>:make # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:make # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:makes # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:made # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:making # ;

LEXICON V_DO

%<inf%>:do # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:do # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:does # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:did # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:doing # ;

LEXICON V_FALL

%<inf%>:fall # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:fall # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:falls # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:fell # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:falling # ;

LEXICON V_SLEEP

%<inf%>:sleep # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:sleep # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:sleeps # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:slept # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:sleeping # ;

LEXICON V_SEE

%<inf%>:see # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:see # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:sees # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:saw # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:seeing # ;

LEXICON V_STAND

%<inf%>:stand # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:stand # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:stands # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:stood # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:standing # ;

LEXICON V_SING

%<inf%>:sing # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:sing # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:sings # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:sang # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:singing # ;

LEXICON V_DRAW

%<inf%>:draw # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:draw # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:draws # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:drew # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:drawing # ;

LEXICON V_DIE

%<inf%>:die # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:die # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:dies # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:died # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:dying # ;

LEXICON V_TELL
%<inf%>:ell # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ell # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:ells # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:old # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:elling # ;

LEXICON V_SIT
%<inf%>:sit # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:sit # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:sits # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:sat # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:sitting # ;

LEXICON V_BLOW

%<inf%>:blow # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:blow # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:blows # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:blew # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:blowing # ;

LEXICON V_KNOW

%<inf%>:know # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:know # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:knows # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:knew # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:knowing # ;

LEXICON V_SEARCH
%<inf%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:es # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ed # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ing # ;

LEXICON V_RUN
%<inf%>:run # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:run # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:runs # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ran # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:running # ;

LEXICON V_REPLY
%<inf%>:y # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:y # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:ies # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ied # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ying # ;

LEXICON V_HIDE
%<actv%>%<pres%>:hide # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:hides # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:hid # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:hiding # ;

LEXICON V_DEAL

%<inf%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:s # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:t # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ing # ;

LEXICON V_HEAR

%<inf%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:s # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:d # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ing # ;

LEXICON V_FIND

%<actv%>%<pres%>:find # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:finds # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:found # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:finding # ;

LEXICON V_BITE

%<inf%>:e # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:es # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ing # ;

LEXICON V_LOVE

%<inf%>:e # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:es # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ed # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ing # ;

LEXICON V_GET

%<inf%>:get # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:get # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:gets # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:got # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:getting # ;

LEXICON V_EAT

%<inf%>:eat # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:eat # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:eats # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ate # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:eatting # ;

LEXICON V_DRINK

%<inf%>:drink # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:drink # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:drinks # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:drank # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:drinking # ;

LEXICON V_COME

%<inf%>:come # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:come # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:comes # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:came # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:coming # ;

LEXICON V_SIT

%<inf%>:sit # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:sit # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:sits # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:sat # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:sitting # ;

LEXICON V_TRY

%<inf%>:y # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:y # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:ies # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ied # ;
%<actv%>%<ger%>:ying # ;

LEXICON Nouns
ass%<n%>:ass N_ILLNESS ;
bacca%<n%>:bacca N ;
boundary%<n%>:boundar N_DICTIONARY ;
bristle%<n%>:bristle N ;
business%<n%>:business N_ILLNESS ;
candy%<n%>:cand N_DICTIONARY ;
child%<n%>:child N_CHILDREN ; ! ""
cloth%<n%>:cloth N_FLUSH ;
cock%<n%>:cock N ;
coldness%<n%>:coldness N_ILLNESS ;
crony%<n%>:cron N_DICTIONARY ;
cup%<n%>:cup N ;
datum%<n%>:dat N_DATUM ;
dirtiness%<n%>:dirtiness N_ILLNESS ;
ditch%<n%>:ditch N_FLUSH ;
drinking%<n%>:drinking N ;
energy%<n%>:energ N_DICTIONARY ;
eyeglasses%<n%>:eyeglasses N_ILLNESS ;
fin%<n%>:fin N ;
fireman%<n%>:firem N_WOMAN ;
flush%<n%>:flush N_FLUSH ;
glitz%<n%>:glitz N_FLUSH ;
goby%<n%>:gob N_DICTIONARY ;
grass%<n%>:grass N_ILLNESS ;
half%<n%>:hal N_HALF ;
hoorah%<n%>:hoorah N ;
horseman%<n%>:horsem N_WOMAN ;
hostess%<n%>:hostess N_ILLNESS ;
huntsman%<n%>:huntsm N_WOMAN ;
hush%<n%>:hush N_FLUSH ;
index%<n%>:ind N_INDEX ;
injury%<n%>:injur N_DICTIONARY ;
journeyman%<n%>:journeym N_WOMAN ;
kudos%<n%>:kudos N_FLUSH ;
layman%<n%>:laym N_WOMAN ;
life%<n%>:li N_LIFE ;
madness%<n%>:madness N_ILLNESS ;
magpie%<n%>:magpie N ;
man%<n%>:m N_WOMAN ;
Matrimony%<n%>:Matrimon N_DICTIONARY ;
moneypouch%<n%>:moneypouch N_FLUSH ;
os%<n%>:os N_ILLNESS ;
palsy%<n%>:pals N_DICTIONARY ;
phenomenon%<n%>:phenomen N_PHENOMENON ;
pinch%<n%>:pinch N_FLUSH ;
pipe%<n%>:pipe N ;
quality%<n%>:qualit N_DICTIONARY ; !
rightness%<n%>:rightness N_ILLNESS ;
roach%<n%>:roach N_FLUSH ;
salesman%<n%>:salesm N_WOMAN ;
secret%<n%>:secret N ;
self%<n%>:sel N_HALF ;
shelf%<n%>:shel N_HALF ;
snuggery%<n%>:snugger N_DICTIONARY ;
staff%<n%>:sta N_STAFF ;
suction%<n%>:suction N ;
Swedish%<n%>:Swedish N_FLUSH ;
tooth%<n%>:0 N_TOOTH ;
tyranny%<n%>:tyrann N_DICTIONARY ;
uptightness%<n%>:uptightness N_ILLNESS ;
wedge%<n%>:wedge N ;
wife%<n%>:wi N_LIFE ;
witch%<n%>:witch N_FLUSH ;
woman%<n%>:wom N_WOMAN ;
LEXICON Verbs
arrive%<vblex%>:arriv V_LOVE ;
bang%<vblex%>:bang V ;
be%<vblex%>:0 V_BE ;
be%<vblex%>:0 V_BE ; ! ""
bite%<vblex%>:bit V_BITE ;
blow%<vblex%>:0 V_BLOW ;
catch%<vblex%>:catch V_SEARCH ;
charge%<vblex%>:charg V_LOVE ;
collect%<vblex%>:collect V ;
come%<vblex%>:0 V_COME ;
come%<vblex%>:0 V_COME ; ! ""
cope%<vblex%>:cop V_LOVE ;
cross%<vblex%>:cross V_SEARCH ;
cry%<vblex%>:cr V_TRY ;
curry%<vblex%>:curr V_TRY ;
curtsy%<vblex%>:curts V_TRY ;
deal%<vblex%>:deal V_DEAL ;
define%<vblex%>:defin V_LOVE ;
deny%<vblex%>:den V_TRY ;
develop%<vblex%>:develop V ;
die%<vblex%>:0 V_DIE ;
distress%<vblex%>:distress V_SEARCH ;
do%<vblex%>:0 V_DO ;
do%<vblex%>:0 V_DO ; ! ""
draw%<vblex%>:0 V_DRAW ;
drink%<vblex%>:0 V_DRINK ; ! ""
dry%<vblex%>:dr V_TRY ;
eat%<vblex%>:0 V_EAT ;
eat%<vblex%>:0 V_EAT ; ! ""
edify%<vblex%>:edif V_TRY ;
elapse%<vblex%>:elaps V_LOVE ;
enjoy%<vblex%>:enjo V_TRY ;
fall%<vblex%>:0 V_FALL ;
find%<vblex%>:0 V_FIND ; ! ""
flash%<vblex%>:flash V_SEARCH ;
follow%<vblex%>:follow V ;
foretell%<vblex%>:foret V_TELL ;
fry%<vblex%>:fr V_TRY ;
gaze%<vblex%>:gaz V_LOVE ;
get%<vblex%>:0 V_GET ; ! ""
have%<vblex%>:0 V_HAVE ; ! ""
hear%<vblex%>:hear V_HEAR ;
hear%<vblex%>:hear V_HEAR ; ! ""
hide%<vblex%>:0 V_HIDE ; ! ""
hog%<vblex%>:hog V ;
hone%<vblex%>:hon V_LOVE ;
hunch%<vblex%>:hunch V_SEARCH ;
hurry%<vblex%>:hurr V_TRY ;
invoke%<vblex%>:invok V_LOVE ;
know%<vblex%>:0 V_KNOW ;
know%<vblex%>:0 V_KNOW ; ! ""
land%<vblex%>:land V ;
make%<vblex%>:0 V_MAKE ;
mash%<vblex%>:mash V_SEARCH ;
offer%<vblex%>:offer V ; ! 
outcry%<vblex%>:outcr V_TRY ;
pass%<vblex%>:pass V_SEARCH ;
paste%<vblex%>:past V_LOVE ;
press%<vblex%>:press V_SEARCH ;
purify%<vblex%>:purif V_TRY ;
reason%<vblex%>:reason V ;
reply%<vblex%>:repl V_REPLY ; ! ""
run%<vblex%>:0 V_RUN ;
run%<vblex%>:0 V_RUN ; ! ""
search%<vblex%>:search V_SEARCH ; ! ""
see%<vblex%>:0 V_SEE ; ! ""
seize%<vblex%>:seiz V_LOVE ;
sell%<vblex%>:s V_TELL ;
shoo%<vblex%>:shoo V ;
sing%<vblex%>:0 V_SING ;
sit%<vblex%>:0 V_SIT ; ! ""
sleep%<vblex%>:0 V_SLEEP ;
stand%<vblex%>:0 V_STAND ;
stomp%<vblex%>:stomp V ;
switch%<vblex%>:switch V_SEARCH ;
tell%<vblex%>:t V_TELL ;
traipse%<vblex%>:traips V_LOVE ;
turn%<vblex%>:turn V ;
understand%<vblex%>:under V_STAND ;
watch%<vblex%>:watch V_SEARCH ; ! ""
